Washington statutes.
RCW 16.50.130

Administration of chapter—Rules.

The director shall administer the provisions of this chapter. He or she shall adopt and may from time to time revise rules which shall conform substantially to the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of agriculture of the United States pursuant to the federal humane slaughter act of 1958, Public Law 85-765, 72 Stat. 862 and any amendments thereto. Such rules shall be adopted pursuant to the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW as enacted or hereafter amended concerning the adoption of rules.

[ 2011 c 336 s 423; 1967 c 31 s 4.]